Arkansas, session 2025, HB1902.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 9-11-218 is amended to read as follows:
9-11-218. Return of executed license to clerk — Effect on bond.
(a) Any person obtaining a license under the provisions of this act
shall be required to return the license to the office of the clerk of the
county court within sixty (60) days from the date of the license.
(b)(1) If the license is duly executed and officially signed by some
person authorized by law to solemnize marriage in this state, the The bond
required by § 9-11-210 shall be deemed null and void if the license:
(A) Is duly executed;
(B) Is officially signed by a person authorized by law to
solemnize marriage in this state; and
(C) Is returned to the county clerk within sixty (60) days
from the date of licensure.
(2) Otherwise, it the bond under § 9-11-210 shall remain in full
*SSS266*
03/31/2025 9:59:50 AM SSS266

HB1902
force and effect.
(c) If a marriage has been legally solemnized and the certificate of
marriage issued by a county in this state required to be returned to the
county clerk under subsection (a) of this section has been lost, burned, or
destroyed, the procedure to request a new certificate of marriage shall be as
follows:
(1) If both parties to the marriage are living, the parties may
request a new certificate of marriage by submitting a notarized affidavit
signed by both parties to the county clerk of the county where the lost or
destroyed certificate of marriage was issued stating:
(A) That the parties applied for and were issued a
certificate of marriage in the county;
(B) That the marriage was solemnized in accordance with
this subchapter and the date the marriage was solemnized;
(C) The name of the person who solemnized the marriage and
stating the person's authority to solemnize the marriage under § 9-11-213;
(D) If the person who solemnized the marriage is a
minister or priest, the county in which the credentials of the minister or
priest are recorded; and
(E) That the certificate of marriage was lost, burned, or
otherwise destroyed and is not able to be returned to the clerk;
(2) If one (1) party to the marriage is living, and the other
party is deceased or otherwise incapacitated, the party that is not deceased
or incapacitated shall request a new certificate of marriage by submitting a
notarized affidavit signed by the party to the county clerk of the county
where the lost, burned, or destroyed certificate of marriage was issued
stating:
(A) The names of both parties who applied for and were
issued a certificate of marriage in the county;
(B) That the marriage was solemnized in accordance with
this subchapter and the date the marriage was solemnized;
(C) The name of the person who solemnized the marriage and
stating the person's authority to solemnize the marriage under § 9-11-213;
(D) If the person who solemnized the marriage is a
minister or priest, the county in which the credentials of the minister or
priest are recorded; and
03/31/2025 9:59:50 AM SSS266

HB1902
(E) That the certificate of marriage was lost, burned, or
otherwise destroyed and is not able to be returned to the clerk; or
(3) If both parties to the marriage are deceased or otherwise
incapacitated, the heirs of the parties to the marriage may request a new
certificate of marriage by submitting, along with a certificate of death of
at least one (1) of the parties, a notarized affidavit signed by the heirs of
the parties to the county clerk of the county where the lost, burned, or
destroyed certificate of marriage was issued stating:
(A) The names of both parties who applied for and were
issued a certificate of marriage in the county;
(B) That the marriage was solemnized in accordance with
this subchapter and the date the marriage was solemnized;
(C) The name of the person who solemnized the marriage and
stating the person's authority to solemnize the marriage under § 9-11-213, if
known;
(D) If the person who solemnized the marriage is a
minister or priest, the county in which the credentials of the minister or
priest are recorded, if known;
(E) That the certificate of marriage was lost, burned, or
otherwise destroyed and is not able to be returned to the clerk; and
(F) That the requestor is an heir of the parties to the
marriage and that the heirs need a new certificate of marriage to carry out
the business of the estate of a party to the marriage.
(d)(1) If a party or heir submits an affidavit under subsection (c) of
this section, the fee for filing the affidavit and furnishing a new
certificate of marriage shall be ten dollars ($10.00) and the one-hundred-
dollar bond required under § 9-11-210 shall be deemed null and void.
(2) The party or heir receiving the certificate of marriage may,
within ninety (90) days after procuring the certificate of marriage from the
county clerk, file the certificate of marriage in the office of the county
clerk where the certificate of marriage was received, whose duty it shall be
to record the certificate of marriage in his or her record of marriage
certificates.
(3) At the time of filing the certificate of marriage, the party
or heir filing the replacement certificate of marriage shall also remit the
current fee for the county clerk to submit the certificate of marriage to the
03/31/2025 9:59:50 AM SSS266

HB1902
Division of Vital Records.
(4) The certificate of marriage shall relate back and have full
force and effect from the date of the solemnization of the marriage.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 14-20-111, concerning marriage license
fees, is amended to add an additional subsection to read as follows:
(d) If a replacement certificate of marriage is requested under § 9-
11-218(c), the one-hundred-dollar bond required under § 9-11-210 shall be
deemed null and void and the fee for filing the affidavit and furnishing a
new certificate of marriage shall be ten dollars ($10.00).

SECTION 3. Arkansas Code § 16-119-107 is repealed.
16-119-107. Restoration of marriage records.
(a)(1) In cases where any marriage has been legally solemnized in any
county, and the certificate of marriage required by law to be filed in the
office of the recorder for the county, together with the record thereof, has
been lost, destroyed, or burned, it shall be the duty of the person who
solemnized the marriage, at the request and on the demand of either of the
parties between whom the marriage was solemnized, to furnish him, her, or
them, under his or her hand, a certificate of marriage.
(2) The certificate, in addition to setting forth the date of
the marriage and the names, ages, and residences of the parties at the time
the marriage ceremony was performed between them and that he or she performed
the marriage ceremony between them, shall also set forth in what capacity the
person granting the certificate acted, whether as a judge, justice of the
peace, minister, priest, or otherwise, at the time of the solemnization of
the marriage, and that the original certificate of the marriage was made out
by him or her and duly filed in the office of the clerk and recorder for the
county, as required by law.
(3) The person so receiving the certificate may, within ninety
(90) days after procuring the certificate from the person who solemnized the
marriage, file the certificate in the office of the clerk and recorder of the
county, whose duty it shall be to record the certificate in his or her record
of marriage certificates.
(4) The certificate shall relate back and have full force and
effect from the date of the solemnization of such marriage.
03/31/2025 9:59:50 AM SSS266

HB1902
(b)(1) In case the person who solemnized the marriage has died or
resides beyond the limits of this state so that the certificate cannot be
obtained, then the parties between whom the marriage was originally
solemnized, or the one surviving if either be dead, or their heirs, by their
guardian, in case both the parties are dead, wishing to reinstate the record
of the marriage may file their petition in the office of the clerk of the
county court setting forth therein the substance of the original marriage
certificate or the time when and the person by whom the marriage was
performed, in what capacity the person acted, whether as judge, justice of
the peace, minister, or priest, and that the certificate, with the record
thereof, was lost, destroyed, or burned.
(2) Upon hearing the petition, if the county court is advised of
the truth of the matters contained in the petition, it shall decree that the
marriage record be reinstated upon the records of the recorder's office, and
the clerk of the court shall certify a copy of the petition and decree down
to the recorder, who shall record them.
(3) The marriage record shall relate back and have the same
force and effect from the time when the marriage ceremony was first performed
as though the original record had never been lost, destroyed, or burned.
(4) No such decree shall be made or rendered by the county court
unless:
(A) The petition has been filed in the office of the clerk
of the county court, verified by the affidavit of the petitioner or some
other reputable person for him, her, or them; and
(B) The petitioner has caused a notice of the intended
application to be published in some newspaper printed in the county at least
six (6) weeks before filing the petition with the county court calling on all
persons who might feel themselves concerned to file notice with the county
court as to why the record should not be reinstated upon the records of the
recorder of the county. If no newspaper is printed in the county at the time
of the publication, then the publication may be made in some newspaper
printed in the City of Little Rock, Arkansas.




03/31/2025 9:59:50 AM SSS266